espanol_sustantivo.foma
### espanol_sustantivo.foma ###
read lexc espanol_sustantivo.lexc
define Lexicon;

define MascToFemLastToA  e -> a || _ "*" ,,
			 o -> a || _ "*" ;

define PlusAEndings [ o r | t o r | d o r | i o n | a l];

define MascToFemEndAInsertion [..] -> a || PlusAEndings _ "*";

define StarDelete "*" -> 0;

define WhenInsertE [ q | w | r | t | p | s | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | z | x | c | v | b | n | m | y | i | á | é | í | ó ];

define PluralEInsertion [..] -> e || WhenInsertE "^" _ s; 

define CReplacement c -> qu || _ "^";

define ZXReplacement z -> c || _ "^",,
		     x -> c || _ "^";

define HatDelete "^" -> 0;

define Grammar  Lexicon 		.o. 
      		MascToFemLastToA 	.o. 
		MascToFemEndAInsertion 	.o. 
		StarDelete 		.o. 
		PluralEInsertion 	.o. 
		CReplacement  		.o. 
		ZXReplacement 		.o. 
		HatDelete;


define Exception1 [[p a p á  "+N" "+MASC" "+PL" .x. p a p á s] | 
	[p a p á "+N" "+MASC" "+SG" .x. p a p á]];
define Exception2 [[m a m á  "+N" "+MASC" "+PL" .x. m a m á s] | 
	[m a m á "+N" "+MASC" "+SG" .x. m a m á]];
define Exception3 [[{sofá}  "+N" "+MASC" "+PL" .x. {sofás}] | 
	[{sofá} "+N" "+MASC" "+SG".x. {sofá}]];
define Exception4 [[{club}  "+N" "+MASC" "+PL" .x. {clubs}] | 
	[{club} "+N" "+MASC" "+SG".x. {club}]];
define Exception5 [[{film}  "+N" "+MASC" "+PL" .x. {films}] | 
	[{film} "+N" "+MASC" "+SG".x. {film}]];
define Exception6 [[{déficit}  "+N" "+MASC" "+PL" .x. {déficits}] | 
	[{déficit} "+N" "+MASC" "+SG".x. {déficit}]];




define Exceptions Exception1 | Exception2 | Exception3 | Exception4 | Exception5 | Exception6;

define FullGrammar Exceptions .P. Grammar;

regex FullGrammar;

save stack NormalSustantivo.bin

quit;
